California statutes. Financial Code
(d) Any corporation or organization other than the savings association or a corporation or organization through which the savings association operates, of which a director, officer or controlling person of the savings association meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Is chief executive officer, chief financial officer, or a person performing similar functions.

(2) Is a general partner.

(3) Is a limited partner who, directly or indirectly either alone or with his spouse and the members of his immediate family who are also affiliated persons of the savings association, owns an interest of 10 percent or more in the partnership (based on the value of his contribution) or who, directly or indirectly with other
 directors, officers, and controlling persons of the savings association and their spouses and their immediate family members who are also affiliated persons of the savings association owns an interest of 25 percent or more in the partnership.

(4) Directly or indirectly either alone or with his or her spouse and the members of his or her immediate family who are also affiliated persons of the savings association, owns or controls 10 percent or more of any class of equity securities or owns or controls, with other directors, officers, and controlling persons of the savings association and their spouses and their immediate family members who are also affiliated persons of the savings association, 25 percent or more of any class of equity securities.

(e) Any trust or other estate in which a director, officer, or controlling person of the savings association or the spouse of the person
 has a substantial beneficial interest or as to which the person or his or her spouse serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.6.

“Affiliate” of a savings association, unless otherwise defined, includes any corporation, business trust, unincorporated association or other similar organization which meets the criteria of subdivision (a), (b), or (c), as follows:

(a) The savings association directly or indirectly, owns or controls either a majority of the voting shares or more than 50 per centum of the number of shares voted for the election of its directors, trustees, or other persons exercising similar functions at the preceding election, or controls in any manner the election of a majority of its directors, trustees,
 or other persons exercising similar functions.

(b) Control thereof is held, directly or indirectly through stock ownership or in any other manner, by the shareholders of a savings association who own or control either a majority of the shares of the savings association or more than 50 per centum of the number of shares voted for the election of directors of that savings association at the preceding election, or by trustees for the benefit of the shareholders of any savings association.

(c) A majority of its directors, trustees, or other persons exercising similar functions are directors of any one savings association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.7.

“Controlling person” of a savings association means any person or entity which (a) either directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons or entities, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, 10 percent or more of the voting shares or rights of the association or (b) controls in any manner the election or appointment of a majority of the directors of the association. However, a director of a savings association shall not be deemed to be a controlling person of the association based upon his or her voting, or acting in concert with other directors in voting, proxies (a) obtained in connection
 with an annual solicitation of proxies or (b) obtained from savings account holders and borrowers if the proxies are voted as directed by a majority vote of the entire board of directors of that association, or of a committee of those directors if the committee’s composition and authority are controlled by a majority vote of the entire board and if its authority is revocable by such a majority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.8.

“Immediate family” of any natural person means any of the following (whether by the full or half blood or by adoption):

(a) The person’s spouse, father, mother, children, brothers, sisters, and grandchildren.

(b) The father, mother, brothers, and sisters of the person’s spouse.

(c) The spouse of a child, brother, or sister of the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.9.

“Institution-affiliated party” means any of the following:

(a) Any director, officer, employee or controlling stockholder of, or agent for, a savings association.

(b) Any person who has filed or is required to file an application to become a savings and loan holding company with the commissioner pursuant to Section 5801.

(c) Any shareholder, consultant, joint venture partner, and any other person as determined by the commissioner (by regulation or case-by-case)
 who participates in the conduct of the affairs of a savings association.

(d) Any independent contractor (including any attorney, appraiser, or accountant) who knowingly or recklessly participates in any of the following which caused or is likely to cause more than a minimal financial loss to, or a significant adverse effect on, the savings association:

(1) Any violation of law or regulation.

(2) Any breach of fiduciary duty.

(3) Any unsafe or unsound practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

“Approved by the members,” in the case of a mutual association, means approved by a majority of all votes cast at a duly held regular or special meeting or by the written consent (including consents by proxy) of a majority of the total votes of members outstanding at the close of business on the next business day prior to the date that the requisite written consents have been filed with the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

(a) “Association” or “savings association” means a mutual or stock savings association, savings and loan association or savings bank subject to the provisions of this division, but excluding a federal association.

(b) “Federal association” means a savings and loan association or federal savings bank that is chartered by the Office of Thrift Supervision under Section 5 of the Home Owners’ Loan Act of 1933 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1464), as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

“Certificate of authority” means:

(a) A certificate of authority to transact the business of an association, which is issued by the commissioner pursuant to this division.

(b) An uncanceled annual license issued to an association under prior law which is valid on the effective date of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.5.

“Commercial paper” means any note, draft, or bill of exchange which arises out of a current transaction or the proceeds of which have been or are to be used for current transactions, and which has a maturity at the time of issuance of not exceeding nine months, exclusive of days of grace, or any renewal thereof the maturity of which is likewise limited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 108.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

“Community” means a centralized area or locality in which a body of inhabitants is gathered in one group having common residential, social, or business interests. The term does not necessarily mean a municipal corporation or other political subdivision. A community need not be limited by lines and boundaries. A city, village, town, or other governmental unit, either incorporated or unincorporated, may constitute one community, but a large, populous area under one or more forms of government may be composed of several communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.5.

“Consumer loan” means a loan for personal, family, or household purposes, and loans reasonably incident thereto, and may be made as either open-end or closed-end consumer credit, but does not include credit extended in connection with credit cards or bona fide overdraft loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 2.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.8.

“Corporate debt security” means a marketable obligation, evidencing the indebtedness of any corporation in the form of a bond, note, or debenture, or both note and debenture, which is commonly regarded as a debt security and is not predominantly speculative in nature. A security is marketable if it may be sold with reasonable promptness at a price which corresponds reasonably to its fair value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 3.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

“Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 109.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

“Financial institution” means a thrift institution, commercial bank, or trust company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.

“Impaired condition” means a condition in which the assets of an association in the aggregate do not have a value, as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, equal to or greater than the aggregate amount of liabilities of the association to its creditors, including the holders of its savings accounts and all other persons who are creditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5109.

“Mutual association” means an association for which the articles of incorporation do not authorize the issuance of capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5110.

“Member” means a person holding a savings account of a mutual association. A joint and survivorship or other multiple owner constitutes a single membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5111.

“Mutual capital certificate” means a certificate evidencing an investment in a mutual association and issued pursuant to provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5112.

“Net worth certificate” means a certificate issued by an association in accordance with Section 13i of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, as amended (12 U.S.C., Sec. 1823i) and regulations promulgated thereunder by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5113.

“Person” means any individual, domestic, or foreign corporation, entity, voting trust, business trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, syndicate, organized group of persons, or similar organization, group or entity, whether incorporated or not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5114.

“Primarily residential property” means real estate on which there is located, or will be located pursuant to a real estate loan, any of the following:

(a) A structure or structures designed or used primarily for residential rather than nonresidential purposes and consisting of more than one dwelling unit.

(b) A structure or structures designed or used primarily for residential rather than nonresidential purposes for students, residents, and persons under the care of, or the employees or members of the staff of, an educational,
 health, or welfare institution or facility.

(c) A structure or structures that are used in part for residential purposes for not more than one family and in part for business purposes if the residential use of the structure or structures is substantial and permanent and not merely transitory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5114.5.

“Residential real estate” means any improved real property that is used or intended to be used as a residence and contains not more than four dwelling units.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5115.

“Real estate loan” means a loan or other obligation secured by a lien on real estate, if:

(a) The security property is real estate as defined pursuant to Section 658 of the Civil Code.

(b) The security interest of the association may be enforced as a real estate mortgage, deed of trust, or its equivalent.

(c) The security property is capable of separate appraisal.

(d) The
 association relies substantially upon the real estate as primary security for the loan.

(e) With regard to security property which is a leasehold or other interest for a period of years, the term of interest extends, or is subject to extension or renewal at the option of the association, for a term of at least five years following maturity of the loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 4.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.

“Savings account” means that part of the savings liability of an association that is credited to the holder of the account. A savings account may be referred to as a deposit. For the purposes of Sections 6661, 6662, and 6663 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 6725) through Article 10 (commencing with Section 7000), inclusive, of Chapter 5 of this division, the term “savings account” includes shares, demand accounts, savings deposits and other savings accounts of federal associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.7.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5117.

“Savings bank” means a savings bank organized under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5117.5.

“Savings institution” means a financial institution as defined in Section 5102.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5118.

“Savings liability” means the aggregate amount of savings accounts of depositors, including interest credited to the accounts, less redemptions and withdrawals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5119.

“Service corporation” means a corporation, other than a wholly owned subsidiary referred to in Section 7300 or a wholly owned subsidiary doing business as a finance subsidiary in accordance with the requirements of 12 C.F.R. 563.132, in which at least 80 percent of the shares of stock having voting power are owned by one or more associations or federal associations. As used in this section “voting power” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 194.5 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 8.6.)
-------------------------------------------

5120.

“Statutory net worth” or “net worth” means the sum of the following:

(a) Issued and outstanding capital stock.

(b) Issued and outstanding capital certificates.

(c) Paid-in surplus.

(d) Retained earnings.

(e) Pledged savings accounts of a mutual association with the approval of the commissioner.

(f) General reserves and other amounts as the commissioner prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.76.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5121.

“Stock association” means an association for which the articles of incorporation authorize the issuance of capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.

“Stockholder” means the holder of one or more shares of any class of capital stock of a capital stock association which is organized and operating pursuant to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5123.

“Thrift institution” means an association, a cooperative bank, a homestead association, a building and loan association, a federal association, a federal savings bank, a state or federal credit union, an industrial loan company, and a supervised thrift and residential financing institution of a substantially similar nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5124.

“Withdrawal value” means the amount credited to a savings account less lawful deductions, as shown by the records of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [5203. - 5209.]

5203.

(a) The name, rights, powers, privileges, and immunities of each association in existence on the effective date of this division shall be governed by the provisions of this division to the same extent and effect as if the association had been incorporated pursuant to this division. The articles of incorporation and bylaws of an association existing on the effective date of this division may be amended to conform to the provisions of this division, with or without the issuance or approval by the commissioner of conformed copies of those documents, and the provisions in the articles and bylaws are superseded to the extent that they are
 inconsistent with the provisions of this division, except that the obligations of the existing association between the association and its stockholders, members, or any valid contract between the stockholders or members of the association or between the association and any other persons, existing at the time this division takes effect, shall not be impaired by the provisions of this division. With these exceptions, each association in existence on the effective date of this division shall possess all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities and shall be subject to all the duties, liabilities, disabilities, and restrictions conferred and imposed by this division, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in its articles of incorporation, bylaws, or rules.

(b) The power of each association in existence on the effective date of this division pursuant to its articles of incorporation or bylaws to issue voting interests to savings account
 holders, shall not be impaired by any provision of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

(a) Wherever it is stated in this division that an agreement or contract contrary to any of the division’s provisions is void, the statement is limited to the particular portion of the agreement or contract that is contrary to the provision, and the entire agreement or contract is not void unless the particular part is not a separable portion.

Unless expressly so provided by the commissioner, the violation of any provision of this division does not render invalid any agreement, contract, stock, savings account, note, trust deed, mortgage, or other
 instrument.

(b) No provision of this division imposing any liability, either civil or criminal, applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, regulation, approval, consent, order, direction, or other act of the commissioner, even if the rule, regulation, approval, consent, order, direction, or other act of the commissioner is amended, rescinded, or determined invalid by judicial or other authority, after the act or omission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.78.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

Whenever the term “ association” is used in any provision of law, such term shall be deemed to include savings banks organized under this division; and wherever the term “federal association” is so used, such term shall be deemed to include federal savings banks.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.5.

(a) All references in this division to financial statements, balance sheets, income statements, and statements of changes in financial position of an association and all references to assets, liabilities, earnings, retained earnings, shareholders’ equity, and similar accounting items of an association, mean financial statements or items prepared or determined in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles then applicable which fairly present in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles the matters that they purport to present, subject to any specific accounting treatment
 required or permitted by any provision of this division, or by any regulation or order issued under this division.

(b) The commissioner may, by regulation or order, require any financial statement or accounting item of an association to be prepared or determined in a manner other than in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles if it is found that the other manner of preparation or determination is necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes or provisions of this division. A report utilizing accounting methods required pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall not be available for other than purposes as provided by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.8.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

Whenever the terms “board of directors,” “directors,” or “director” are used in any provision of law, such terms shall mean, with respect to savings banks organized under this division, “board of trustees,” “trustees,” or “trustee.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5207.

If any provision, clause, or phrase of this division or application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, its invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end, the provisions of this division are separable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.

This division, being a comprehensive coverage of its subject matter, shall not be deemed to be impliedly repealed, in whole or in part, by subsequent legislation not specifically repealing it, if that construction can be avoided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5209.

Insofar as the provisions of this division are inconsistent with any other law in effect at the time the provisions of this division are enacted, the provisions of this division shall control. Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 6500, nothing within this section is intended to provide for preemption of other provisions of law expressly overruling the provisions of this division and enacted subsequent to the effective date of the inconsistent provision within this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Penalties [5300. - 5311.]

5300.

Every person who willfully violates or willfully fails to comply with any of the provisions of this division is guilty of a public offense. Except where the offense is declared to be a felony or a misdemeanor or a different punishment is prescribed, a person convicted under this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the county
 jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 100.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5301.

(a) The commissioner may refer such evidence as is available concerning any violation of this division or of any regulation, order issued by the commissioner, or of any condition imposed in writing by the commissioner in connection with any grant of any application or request by the savings association or of a written agreement between the savings association and the commissioner to the Attorney General or to the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred, who may, with or without such a referral, institute appropriate civil or criminal proceedings under this division.

(b) The commissioner and his or her counsel, deputies, or assistants may, upon request of the Attorney General or district attorney, assist the Attorney General or district attorney in presenting law or facts at any trial in these proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

(a) Whoever knowingly violates subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 6525.5 shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each day the violation continues, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 2, 3, or 4 years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who is subject to an order issued pursuant to Section 8201 who knowingly violates the order, directly or indirectly, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each day violation continues, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 2, 3, or 4 years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 101.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

Any officer, director, employee, or agent of any association who (a) willfully makes or knowingly concurs in the making or publishing of a false or untrue material entry in any book, record, report, statement concerning the business or affairs of the association, or statement of condition or in connection with any transaction of the association, with intent to deceive any officer or director
 thereof, or with intent to deceive any agency or examiner, whether private or public, employed or lawfully appointed to examine into the association’s condition or to examine into any of the association’s affairs or transactions, or with intent to deceive any public officer, office, or board to which the association is required by law to report or that has authority by law to examine into the association’s affairs or transactions, (b) with like intent, willfully omits to make a material new entry of any matter particularly pertaining to the business, property, condition, affairs, transactions, assets, or accounts of the association in any appropriate book, record, report, or statement of the association, which entry is required to be made by law or generally accepted accounting principles applicable to a savings institution, or (c) with like intent, willfully alters, abstracts, conceals, refuses to allow to be inspected by the commissioner or the commissioner’s deputies or examiners, or destroys any books,
 records, reports, or statements of the association made, written, or kept, or required to be made, written, or kept by him or her or under his or her direction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 102.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5304.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to corruptly give, offer, or promise anything of value to any other person, with intent to influence or reward any institution-affiliated party in connection with any business or transaction of a savings association.

(b) It is unlawful for any institution-affiliated party to
 corruptly solicit or demand for the benefit of any person, or corruptly accept or agree to accept, anything of value from any person, intending to be influenced or rewarded in connection with any business or transaction of the savings association.

(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) or three times the value of the thing given, offered, promised, solicited, demanded, accepted, or agreed to be accepted, whichever is greater, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 2, 3, or 4 years, or by both that fine and imprisonment. However, if the value of the thing given, offered, promised, solicited, demanded, accepted, or agreed to be accepted does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), the offense shall instead be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for
 not more than one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) This section does not apply to bona fide salary, wages, fees, or other compensation paid, or expenses paid or reimbursed, in the usual course of business or where the amount of money or monetary worth of the thing of value is one hundred dollars ($100) or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 103.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5305.

Any institution-affiliated party who abstracts or willfully misapplies any of the money, funds, or property of the savings association, or willfully misapplies its credit, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 2, 3, or 4 years, or by both that fine and
 imprisonment. However, if the amount abstracted or willfully misapplied does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the offense shall instead be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 104.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5306.

Any institution-affiliated party who knowingly executes, or attempts to execute, a scheme or artifice to defraud a savings association or to obtain any of the moneys, funds, credits, assets, securities or other property owned by or under the custody or control of a savings association by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, or promises, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), by imprisonment in state prison for 2, 3, or 4 years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5307.

Whoever willfully and knowingly makes, issues, circulates, transmits, or causes or knowingly permits to be made, issued, circulated, or transmitted, any statement or rumor which is written, printed, reproduced in any manner, or communicated by word of mouth, that is untrue in fact and is directly or by inference false, or malicious in that it is calculated to injure the reputation or business,
 financial condition, or standing of any association shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 105.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5308.

Whoever knowingly makes or causes to be made, directly or indirectly, or through any agency whatsoever, any false statement or report, or willfully overvalues any land, property, or security, for the purpose of influencing in any way the action of any association upon any application, advance, discount, purchase or repurchase agreement, commitment, or loan or the change or extension of any of these transactions by renewal, deferment of action, or otherwise, or the acceptance, release, or substitution of security for these transactions shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or, by imprisonment in the county jail not
 exceeding one year or in the state prison, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5301 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5309.

(a) A person shall be sentenced to consecutive terms for each violation of Section 5303, 5304, 5305, or 5306 up to a mandatory term of 20 years in state prison if all of the following are charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant, or found to be true by the trier of fact: 

(1) The person is an institution affiliated party. 

(2) The person engaged in a pattern and practice of activity involving multiple violations of Section 5303, 5304, 5305, or 5306. 

(3) The person acted with intent to cause substantial harm, or with reckless disregard of the possibility of causing substantial harm, to the savings institution. 

(4) The violations did in fact result in substantial harm to the savings institution. 

(b) No part of a consecutive sentence required pursuant to subdivision (a) may be suspended or revoked by the court. 

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall limit the court’s discretion to sentence the defendant to a consecutive term longer than provided for in that subdivision, if otherwise permitted by law. 

(d) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall limit the court’s discretion to order consecutive sentences for violations of Section 5303, 5304, 5305,
 or 5306 under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5307 (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 118, Sec. 18.5) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

5310.

(a) Any person violating or conspiring to violate Sections 5303, 5304, 5305, or 5306 shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount assessed by the court in a civil action under this section.

(b) The maximum amount of the penalty which may be imposed under this section shall be determined in accordance with the following:

(1) Except as provided by paragraphs (2) and (3), the civil penalty shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) In the case of a continuing violation, the amount of the civil penalty may exceed the amount described in paragraph (1), but may not exceed the lesser of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each day the violation continues or five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(3) If any person derives pecuniary gain from the violation, or if the violation results in pecuniary loss to a person other than the violator, the amount of the civil penalty may exceed the amounts described in paragraphs (1) and (2) but may not exceed the amount of that gain or loss.

(c) A civil action to recover a civil penalty under this section shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, who shall be required to establish the right to recovery by a preponderance of the evidence.

(d) For
 the purpose of conducting a civil investigation in contemplation of proceeding under this section, the Attorney General may do all of the following:

(1) Administer oaths and affirmations.

(2) Take evidence.

(3) By subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, summon witnesses and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, or other records which the Attorney General deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

5311.

(a) Any fine or civil penalty imposed under this chapter shall be based upon the ability of the defendant to pay. In setting the amount of the fine or civil penalty, consideration shall also be given to the seriousness of the offense, the amount of any pecuniary gain by the defendant, and the amount of any pecuniary loss, other than defendant’s own loss, caused by the offense.

(b) A civil penalty may not be imposed against a person under this chapter if that person has been punished by a fine or imprisonment for the same violation. 

(c) A fine may not be imposed under this chapter if a civil penalty has previously been imposed for the same violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 19.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Criminal Forfeiture [5320. - 5325.]

5320.

If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 5303, 5304, 5305, or 5306, or is convicted of a felony for a violation of Section 25540 or 25541 of the Corporations Code in connection with the operation of a lending institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to this division, or is convicted of a felony violation of Section 487 or 504 of the Penal Code in connection with the operation of a lending institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to this division any property which constitutes or is derived from
 proceeds traceable to that violation is subject to forfeiture pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 549.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5321.

(a) The prosecuting agency shall, prior to, in conjunction with, or subsequent to the criminal proceeding, file a petition of forfeiture with the superior court of the county in which the defendant has been or will be charged with the underlying criminal offense. The petition shall allege that the defendant has engaged in acts chargeable as crimes pursuant to the criminal provisions enumerated in Section 5320 and shall identify the property subject to forfeiture. A notice regarding the petition shall be provided, by personal service or